Utah statutes.
32A-8-104.   Duties of commission and department before issuing licenses.
(1)  Before any alcoholic beverage manufacturing license may be granted by the
commission, the department shall conduct an investigation and may hold public
hearings for the purpose of gathering information and making recommendations
to the commission as to whether or not a license should be granted.  This
information shall be forwarded to the commission to aid in its determination.
(2)  Before issuing any alcoholic beverage manufacturing license, the
commission shall:
(a)  determine that the applicant has complied with all basic qualifications
and requirements for making application for a license as provided by Sections
32A-8-102 and  32A-8-103, and that the application is complete;
(b)  consider the applicant's ability to properly utilize the manufacturing
license within the restrictions of this title and the commission rules
including, but not limited to, manufacturing capacity, extent of product
distribution, and the nature and type of organization making use of the
license;
(c)  consider the physical characteristics of the premises where alcoholic
beverages are proposed to be manufactured, mixed, or stored, such as condition
of the premises and safety and security considerations;
(d)  consider any special factors or circumstances as provided in this chapter
that may be unique to the specific type of license sought by the applicant;
(e)  approve of the location and equipment utilized by the applicant to
manufacture alcoholic beverages; and
(f)  consider any other factors or circumstances it considers necessary.
